North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116C. Continuum of Education Programs.
Article 2. North Carolina Postsecondary Attainment Goal.

§ 116C-10.
North Carolina postsecondary attainment goal.

Findings. — The General Assembly finds it necessary to set a goal for postsecondary attainment for North Carolina residents to ensure that the State remains economically competitive now and into the future.

Postsecondary Attainment Goal. — The State shall make significant efforts to increase access to learning and improve the education of more North Carolinians so that, by the year 2030, 2,000,000 residents between the ages of 25 and 44 will have completed a high-quality credential or postsecondary degree.

Rights Not Created. — The attainment goal established in this section is not to the exclusion of any other goals and does not confer a right or create a claim for any person.

History.

2019-55, s. 1(b).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2019-55 provides in its preamble: “Whereas, the State of North Carolina is one of nine states in the country that does not have a shared postsecondary attainment goal and has less than half the 25- to 44-year-old workforce with a postsecondary degree or certificate; and

“Whereas, the myFutureNC Commission, a statewide group of business, education, and government leaders, recently studied North Carolina’s evolving workforce needs and the alignment between future demands and trends in educational attainment; and

“Whereas, based on that study, the myFutureNC Commission developed an educational attainment goal that will ensure North Carolina remains economically competitive now and into the future; and

“Whereas, to make progress towards that goal, the North Carolina higher education community must improve student outcomes, reduce the time to graduation, and create opportunities that meet the needs of today’s students; and

“Whereas, increasing on-time graduation rates at institutions of higher education and expanding access to high-quality workforce training places more graduates into the workforce more quickly, reduces student debt, and increases the supply of skilled workers in North Carolina, making the State more attractive to businesses to start, expand, or relocate; Now, therefore,”

Session Laws 2019-55, s. 1, provides: “Beginning September 1, 2020, and every September 1 thereafter, the myFutureNC Commission, which is a statewide commission focusing on postsecondary educational attainment in North Carolina, shall report to the General Assembly, as provided by

G.S. 120-29.5

, and to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the progress of the State reaching the postsecondary attainment goal set forth in

G.S. 116C-10

, as enacted by this act, and activities by the Commission to further North Carolina towards the postsecondary attainment goal.”

Session Laws 2019-55, s. 2, made this Article effective June 26, 2019.